Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 9 Initiatives, Referenda, and Constitutional Amendments
7-9-409. Financial reports — Time to file — Late fee.

(a)(1)

The first financial reports shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days following the month in which the five-hundred-dollar threshold of §7-9-406 is met and thereafter no later than fifteen (15) days after the end of each month until the election is held. Provided, however, for any month in which certain days of that month are included in a preelection financial report required under subdivision (a)(2) of this section, no monthly report for that month shall be due, but those days of that month shall be carried forward and included in the final financial report.

(2)

Additionally, a preelection financial report shall be filed no fewer than seven (7) days prior to any election on the ballot question or legislative question, such statement to have a closing date of ten (10) days prior to the election.

(3)

Furthermore, a final financial report shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the election.

(b)

A ballot question committee, legislative question committee, or individual person who files a late financial report shall be subject to a late filing fee not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for each day the report remains unfiled.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, §§ 7, 8; 1989, No. 634, §§ 7, 8; 1999, No. 553, §§ 25, 27; 2007, No. 1001, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “twenty-five dollars ($25.00)” in (b).

7-9-410. Public inspection — Record retention.

(a)

All statements of organization and financial reports required by this subchapter shall be open to public inspection at the office of the Arkansas Ethics Commission during regular office hours.

(b)

All records supporting the reports filed under this subchapter shall be:

(1)

Made available to the commission; and

(2)

Retained by the filer for a period of four (4) years after the date of filing the report.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 261, § 9; 1989, No. 634, § 9; 1993, No. 1114, § 7; 1999, No. 553, § 28; 2007, No. 221, § 15.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (b)(1) and designated the existing provisions as (b)(2).

7-9-411. Enforcement.

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall have the same power and authority to enforce the provisions of this subchapter as is provided the commission under §§7-6-217 and7-6-218 for the enforcement of campaign finance laws.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1114, § 8.

7-9-412 — 7-9-414. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the use of state funds to oppose or support a ballot measure, were repealed by Acts 2013, No. 312, § 6. The sections were derived from the following sources:

7-9-412. Acts 1999, No. 1006, § 1.

7-9-413. Acts 1999, No. 1006, § 2.

7-9-414. Acts 1999, No. 1006, § 3.

7-9-415. Scope.

Nothing in this subchapter may limit, waive, or abrogate the scope of any statutory or common law privilege, including, but not limited to, the work product doctrine and the attorney-client privilege.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1765, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§7-9-401 to7-9-411 may not apply to this section, which was enacted subsequently.

Subchapter 5

— Review of Initiative Petitions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, §
1 provided: “Legislative findings.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Through Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, the people of Arkansas have reserved to themselves the power to propose legislative measures, laws, and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution and to enact or reject the proposed measures, laws, and amendments at the polls independently of the General Assembly;

“(2)

The citizens of this state have an expectation that their right of initiative and referendum will be respected and that the process of gathering signatures of registered voters will be free of fraud, forgery, and other illegal conduct by sponsors, canvassers, notaries, and petitioners;

“(3)

Sponsors and paid canvassers may have an incentive to knowingly submit forged or otherwise invalid signatures in order to obtain additional time to gather signatures and submit supplemental petitions;

“(4)

In 2012, sponsors of four (4) separate initiative petitions submitted petitions to the Secretary of State containing over two hundred ninety-eight thousand (298,000) purported signatures of registered voters;

“(5)

Of the four petitions submitted, none had an initial validity rate in excess of fifty-six percent (56%), and three (3) of the petitions had an initial validity rate below thirty-one percent (31%); and

“(6)

Of the three petitions with the lowest initial validity rate, there were widespread instances of apparent fraud, forgery, and false statements in the signature-gathering process.

“(b)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if an effort is not made to address these issues:

“(1)

Untrained paid canvassers will continue to obtain and submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures; and

“(2)

Unscrupulous sponsors and canvassers will continue to have an incentive to submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures and make false statements to the Secretary of State.

“(c)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if this act becomes law:

“(1)

Sponsors and canvassers of proposed initiative measures will be held more accountable for their actions in gathering signatures from registered voters; and

“(2)

The earlier determination of the insufficiency of petitions rife with false statements, forged signatures, and otherwise facially invalid signatures will result in less confusion and frustration with the initiative process.

“(d)

For the reasons stated in this section, the General Assembly finds that passage of this act will make sponsors and canvassers more accountable to the people of this state, facilitate the initiative process, conserve state resources, and help to restore the confidence and trust of the people in the initiative process.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 877, § 10: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the current procedures for review of the sufficiency of initiative petitions is insufficient; that in matters affecting amendments to the Constitution and measures to be voted on by the people, there should be a certainty with reference to the amendment or measure affected; and that this act is immediately necessary to provide for a timely and expeditious review of the sufficiency of initiative petitions. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 22: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing procedures for initiating and referring state laws and ordinances pursuant to Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution and state statutes are inadequate to prevent fraudulent practices by sponsors and canvassers in obtaining ballot access; that this act addresses these inadequacies; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent fraudulent practices because petition campaigns are either being conducted at the present time or may be conducted immediately upon the adjournment of the General Assembly with respect to either initiated or referred measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

7-9-501 — 7-9-506. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter was repealed by Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 20. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

7-9-501. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 1.

7-9-502. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 6.

7-9-503. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 2.

7-9-504. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 3.

7-9-505. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 4.

7-9-506. Acts 1999, No. 877, § 5.

Subchapter 6

— Paid Canvassers

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, §
1 provided: “Legislative findings.

“(a)

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Through Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution, the people of Arkansas have reserved to themselves the power to propose legislative measures, laws, and amendments to the Arkansas Constitution and to enact or reject the proposed measures, laws, and amendments at the polls independently of the General Assembly;

“(2)

The citizens of this state have an expectation that their right of initiative and referendum will be respected and that the process of gathering signatures of registered voters will be free of fraud, forgery, and other illegal conduct by sponsors, canvassers, notaries, and petitioners;

“(3)

Sponsors and paid canvassers may have an incentive to knowingly submit forged or otherwise invalid signatures in order to obtain additional time to gather signatures and submit supplemental petitions;

“(4)

In 2012, sponsors of four (4) separate initiative petitions submitted petitions to the Secretary of State containing over two hundred ninety-eight thousand (298,000) purported signatures of registered voters;

“(5)

Of the four petitions submitted, none had an initial validity rate in excess of fifty-six percent (56%), and three (3) of the petitions had an initial validity rate below thirty-one percent (31%); and

“(6)

Of the three petitions with the lowest initial validity rate, there were widespread instances of apparent fraud, forgery, and false statements in the signature-gathering process.

“(b)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if an effort is not made to address these issues:

“(1)

Untrained paid canvassers will continue to obtain and submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures; and

“(2)

Unscrupulous sponsors and canvassers will continue to have an incentive to submit forged and otherwise facially invalid signatures and make false statements to the Secretary of State.

“(c)

It is further found and determined by the General Assembly that if this act becomes law:

“(1)

Sponsors and canvassers of proposed initiative measures will be held more accountable for their actions in gathering signatures from registered voters; and

“(2)

The earlier determination of the insufficiency of petitions rife with false statements, forged signatures, and otherwise facially invalid signatures will result in less confusion and frustration with the initiative process.

“(d)

For the reasons stated in this section, the General Assembly finds that passage of this act will make sponsors and canvassers more accountable to the people of this state, facilitate the initiative process, conserve state resources, and help to restore the confidence and trust of the people in the initiative process.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 22: Apr. 22, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that existing procedures for initiating and referring state laws and ordinances pursuant to Amendment 7 to the Arkansas Constitution and state statutes are inadequate to prevent fraudulent practices by sponsors and canvassers in obtaining ballot access; that this act addresses these inadequacies; and that this act is immediately necessary to prevent fraudulent practices because petition campaigns are either being conducted at the present time or may be conducted immediately upon the adjournment of the General Assembly with respect to either initiated or referred measures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 376, § 14: Mar. 8, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act amends the process for circulating initiative petitions and referendum petitions; and that the provisions of this act should become effective immediately so that its provisions apply to all petitions circulated after the passage of the act to avoid confusion in petition circulation. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto”. The emergency clause for Acts 2019, No. 376 was held to be defective in Safe Surgery Ark. v. Thurston, 2019 Ark. 403.

7-9-601. Hiring and training of paid canvassers — Definition.

(a)(1)

A person shall not provide money or anything of value to another person for obtaining signatures on a statewide initiative petition or statewide referendum petition unless the person receiving the money or item of value meets the requirements of this section.

(2)

Before a signature is solicited by a paid canvasser the sponsor shall:

(A)

Provide the paid canvasser with a copy of the most recent edition of the Secretary of State's initiatives and referenda handbook;

(B)

Explain the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining signatures on an initiative or referendum petition to the canvasser;

(C)(i)

Provide a complete list of all paid canvassers' names and current residential addresses to the Secretary of State.

(ii)

If additional paid canvassers agree to solicit signatures on behalf of a sponsor after the complete list is provided, the sponsor shall provide an updated list of all paid canvassers' names and current residential addresses to the Secretary of State; and

(D)

Submit to the Secretary of State a copy of the signed statement provided by the paid canvasser under subdivision (d)(3) of this section.

(3)

Upon filing the petition with the Secretary of State, the sponsor shall submit to the Secretary of State a:

(A)

Final list of the names and current residential addresses of each paid canvasser; and

(B)

Signature card for each paid canvasser.

(b)(1)

To verify that there are no criminal offenses on record, a sponsor shall obtain, at the sponsor’s cost, from the Division of Arkansas State Police, a current state and federal criminal record search on every paid canvasser to be registered with the Secretary of State.

(2)

The criminal record search shall be obtained within thirty (30) days before the date that the paid canvasser begins collecting signatures.

(3)

Upon submission of the sponsor’s list of paid canvassers to the Secretary of State, the sponsor shall certify to the Secretary of State that each paid canvasser in the sponsor’s employ has passed a criminal background check in accordance with this section.

(4)

A willful violation of this section by a sponsor or paid canvasser constitutes a Class A misdemeanor.

(c)

As used in this section, “paid canvasser” means a person who is paid or with whom there is an agreement to pay money or anything of value before or after a signature on an initiative or referendum petition is solicited in exchange for soliciting or obtaining a signature on a petition.

(d)

Before obtaining a signature on an initiative or referendum petition as a paid canvasser, the prospective canvasser shall submit in person or by mail to the sponsor:

(1)

The full name and any assumed name of the person;

(2)

The current residence address of the person and the person's permanent domicile address if the person's permanent domicile address is different from the person's current residence address;

(3)

A signed statement taken under oath or solemn affirmation stating that the person has not pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of a criminal felony offense or a violation of the election laws, fraud, forgery, or identification theft in any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, Guam, or any other United States protectorate;

(4)

A signed statement that the person has read and understands the Arkansas law applicable to obtaining signatures on an initiative or referendum petition; and

(5)

A signed statement that the person has been provided a copy of the most recent edition of the Secretary of State's initiatives and referenda handbook by the sponsor.

(e)

A sponsor shall maintain the information required under this section for each paid canvasser for three (3) years after the general election.

(f)

Signatures incorrectly obtained or submitted under this section shall not be counted by the Secretary of State for any purpose.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1413, § 21; 2015, No. 1219, § 4; 2017, No. 1104, § 6; 2019, No. 376, § 13.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment rewrote (b); redesignated former (c) as (e) and former (d) as (c); and inserted (d).

The 2017 amendment added (a)(3); substituted “before the date that the paid canvasser begins collecting signatures” for “prior to the registration of the paid canvasser” in (b)(2); substituted “background check” for “background search” in (b)(3); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1), inserted the first occurrence of “petition” and inserted the second occurrence of “statewide”; added (a)(2)(D); redesignated (b)(5) as (f); and added “for any purpose” in (f).